District of Columbia statutes.
29-901

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “General Cooperative Association Act of 2010”.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Homestead housing preparation program, “condominium or unit owners association” defined, see § 42-2103.
Rental housing conversions and sales, “cooperative” and “Cooperative Act” defined, see § 42-3401.03.
This section is referenced in § 42-3401.03.